District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-807

Amendment of pre-effective-date financing statement.

(a)

For the purposes of this section and § 28:9-806, “pre-effective-date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before the applicability date.

(b)

After the applicability date, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, if the law of the District governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended after the applicability date only if:

(1)

The pre-effective-date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in § 28:9-501;

(2)

An amendment is filed in the office specified in § 28:9-501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies § 28:9- 806(c); or

(3)

An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies § 28:9-806(c) is filed in the office specified in § 28:9-501.

(d)

If the law of the District governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement may be continued only under § 28:9-805(c) and (e) or § 28:9-806.

(e)

Whether or not the law of the District governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement filed in the District may be terminated after the applicability date by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies § 28:9-806(c) has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Article 9 as amended by the 2012 Act as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-302, § 2(s), 60 DCR 2688

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-302: Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-302 provided that the act shall apply as of July 1, 2013.